Alaska statutes. Title 3. Agriculture, Animals, and Food.
Chapter 45. Diseased Livestock.

Administrative Code. —

For animal disease control and eradication, see 18 AAC 36, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d, Agriculture, § 38 et seq.

4 Am. Jur. 2d, Animals, §§ 35-39

35A Am. Jur. 2d, Food, § 1 et seq.

3B C.J.S., Animals, §§ 123-197.

Admissibility of opinion evidence of lay witnesses as to diseases and physical condition of animals. 49 ALR2d 932.

Extent of liability of seller of livestock infected with communicable disease. 14 ALR4th 1096.

Sec. 03.45.010.
Declaration of public policy.

It is against the public policy of this state to import into the state or to own, have in one’s possession, sell, transfer, transport, drive, or convey inside the state any animal diseased or infected with any of the diseases described in AS

03.45.030

.

History.

(§§ 33-3-11, 33-3-12 ACLA 1949)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The statutory authority for the Department of Natural Resources’ jurisdiction over importation of animals is, with the possible exception of rabid animals and animals diseased with livestock diseases listed in AS

03.45.030

, limited to domestic animals and poultry, and does not extend to live feral animals, whether indigenous to the State of Alaska or not.
August 29, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

A Department of Natural Resources regulation restricting the importation into the state of “any animal . . . affected with any infections or communicable disease” exceeded the scope of the statutory authority for the regulation where the regulation was applicable not only to domestic animals but also to wild or feral animals.
August 29, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 03.45.020.
Importation, ownership, possession, transfer, and transportation of diseased animals prohibited.

A person may not import into the state, own, have in one’s possession, sell, transfer, transport, drive, or convey, inside the state any animal diseased or infected with any of the diseases described in AS

03.45.030

.

History.

(§§ 33-3-11, 33-3-12 ACLA 1949)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The statutory authority for the Department of Natural Resources’ jurisdiction over importation of animals is, with the possible exception of rabid animals and animals diseased with livestock diseases listed in AS

03.45.030

, limited to domestic animals and poultry, and does not extend to live feral animals, whether indigenous to the State of Alaska or not.
August 29, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

A Department of Natural Resources regulation restricting the importation into the state of “any animal . . . affected with any infections or communicable disease” exceeded the scope of the statutory authority for the regulation where the regulation was applicable not only to domestic animals but also to wild or feral animals.
August 29, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 03.45.030.
Conditions of importation of certain animals.

A person may not bring into the state any horse, cattle, or swine for work, feeding, breeding, dairying, or for any other purpose unless the animal has been examined and found free from glanders, farcy, tuberculosis, actinomycosis, rinderpest, foot and mouth disease, contagious abortion, contagious keratitis, scabies, maladie du coit, swine plague, and hog cholera.
Swine in addition shall have been given the serum treatment for hog cholera within two weeks before shipping, unless a permit has been obtained from the proper authorities of the state, territory, or foreign country from which the animal is shipped, or from an inspector of the Department of Agriculture of the United States assigned to the division of dairy and livestock in the state, territory, or foreign country from which the animal is shipped.
A steamship or transportation company or other common carrier may not bring any animal into the state without first having had it examined, or treated, and found free from the diseases described in this section and having obtained the permit provided for in this section.

History.

(§ 33-3-13 ACLA 1949)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The statutory authority for the Department of Natural Resources’ jurisdiction over importation of animals is, with the possible exception of rabid animals and animals diseased with livestock diseases listed in AS

03.45.030

, limited to domestic animals and poultry, and does not extend to live feral animals, whether indigenous to the State of Alaska or not.
August 29, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

A Department of Natural Resources regulation restricting the importation into the state of “any animal . . . affected with any infections or communicable disease” exceeded the scope of the statutory authority for the regulation where the regulation was applicable not only to domestic animals but also to wild or feral animals.
August 29, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Secs. 03.45.040 — 03.45.080.
Penalties; Inspection, quarantine, or destruction of livestock; Procedure for quarantine, destruction, and reimbursement; Compensation to owners of dairy cattle destroyed; records to be kept; Record and payment of value of destroyed dairy cattle. [Repealed, § 10 ch 59 SLA 2006.]